Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
OWNERSHIP AND MOVEMENT OF

AGRICULTURAL
COMMODITIES

§145-21 Definitions. For purposes of
this part:

"Agricultural commodity" means any
fruit, nut, or vegetable that is the food product of any tree, vine, or plant,
or any aquacultural, horticultural, silvicultural, or floricultural product.

"Person" means any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, or association. [L 1999, c 186, pt of §2; am L 2003,
c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next